Nevada, session 83, AB41.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 412.042 is hereby amended to read as follows:
412.042 1. The military staff of the Governor consists of the
Adjutant General , the Deputy Adjutant General and [not more
than] two Assistant Adjutants General selected from the
commissioned officers of the Nevada National Guard [.] , as
described in NRS 412.054.
2. The military staff of the Governor shall perform such
ceremonial functions and duties as the Governor may prescribe.
Sec. 2. NRS 412.054 is hereby amended to read as follows:
412.054 1. The Adjutant General may appoint [two] :
(a) A Deputy Adjutant General from the Nevada Army
National Guard or the Nevada Air National Guard; and
(b) Two Assistant Adjutants General, one each from the Nevada
Army National Guard and the Nevada Air National Guard . [, who
may serve as Chief of Staff for Army and Chief of Staff for Air,
respectively,]
2. The Deputy Adjutant General and Assistant Adjutants
General serve at the pleasure of the Adjutant General or until
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
relieved by reason of resignation, withdrawal of federal recognition
or for cause to be determined by a court-martial.
[2.] 3. To be eligible for appointment to the office of Deputy
Adjutant General or Assistant Adjutant General, a person must be
an officer of the Nevada National Guard and be federally recognized
in the grade of colonel or higher and must have completed at least 4
years of service in the Nevada National Guard as a federally
recognized officer.
[3. An]
4. The Deputy Adjutant General or an Assistant Adjutant
General may be appointed in the grade of colonel or higher, but not
exceeding that of brigadier general. [An] The Deputy Adjutant
General or an Assistant Adjutant General may be promoted by the
Governor to any grade not exceeding that of brigadier general.
[4.] 5. The Deputy Adjutant General and Assistant Adjutants
General shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the
Adjutant General.
[5. Whoever serves as Chief of Staff for Army]
6. The Deputy Adjutant General is in the unclassified service
of the State and, except as otherwise provided in NRS 284.143, shall
not hold any other city, county, state or federal office of profit.
[6.] 7. In the event of the absence or inability of the Adjutant
General to perform his or her duties, the Adjutant General shall
designate by Office regulations:
(a) [One] The Deputy Adjutant General to perform the duties
of the Adjutant General as Acting Adjutant General.
(b) If the Deputy Adjutant General is unavailable, one of the
Assistant Adjutants General to perform the duties of [his or her
office] the Adjutant General as Acting Adjutant General.
[(b)] (c) If [neither] the Deputy Adjutant General and the
Assistant [Adjutant] Adjutants General [is] are not available, any
national guard officer to [be] perform the duties of the Adjutant
General as Acting Adjutant General.
 The designated Deputy Adjutant General, designated Assistant
Adjutant General or designated officer may continue to receive his
or her authorized salary while so serving as Acting Adjutant
General, and shall so serve until the Adjutant General is again able
to perform the duties of the office, or if the office is vacant, until an
Adjutant General is regularly appointed and qualified.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)